Georgia statutes. TITLE 35 Law Enforcement Officers and Agencies
Article 2 Georgia Crime Information Center
35-3-38.
Unauthorized requests or disclosures of criminal history record information; disclosure of techniques used to ensure security or privacy of criminal history records.

Any person who knowingly requests, obtains, or attempts to obtain criminal history record information under false pretenses, or who knowingly communicates or attempts to communicate criminal history record information to any agency or person except in accordance with this article, or any member, officer, employee or agent of the center, the council, or any participating agency who knowingly falsifies criminal history record information or any records relating thereto shall for each such offense, upon conviction thereof, be fined not more than $5,000.00, or imprisoned for not more than two years, or both.

Any person who communicates or attempts to communicate criminal history record information in a negligent manner not in accordance with this article shall for each such offense, upon conviction thereof, be fined not more than $100.00, or imprisoned not more than ten days, or both.

Any person who knowingly discloses or attempts to disclose the techniques or methods employed to ensure the security and privacy of information or data contained in criminal justice information systems except in accordance with this article shall for each such offense, upon conviction thereof, be fined not more than $5,000.00, or imprisoned not more than two years, or both.

Any person who discloses or attempts to disclose the techniques or methods employed to ensure the security and privacy of information or data contained in criminal justice information systems in a manner not permitted by this article shall for each such offense, upon conviction thereof, be fined not more than $100.00, or imprisoned not more than ten days, or both.

History.

Ga. L. 1973, p. 1301, § 7; Ga. L. 1976, p. 617, § 8; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 35.

35-3-39.
Effect of neglect or refusal of official to act as required by article.

Any officer or official mentioned in this article who shall neglect or refuse to make any report or to do any act required by any provision of this article shall be deemed guilty of nonfeasance in office and subject to removal therefrom.

History.

Ga. L. 1973, p. 1301, § 8.

35-3-39.1.
National Crime Prevention and Privacy Compact; ratification; criminal history records repository.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Compact” means the National Crime Prevention and Privacy Compact established by Section 217 of the federal law.

“Compact council” means the compact council established by Article VI of the compact.

“Director” means the director of the Georgia Crime Information Center.

“Federal law” means the National Crime Prevention and Privacy Compact Act of 1998 contained in Public Law 92-544, 42 U.S.C. Section 14616.

“Interstate Identification Index System” or “III System” means the cooperative federal-state system for the exchange of criminal history records as provided for in the compact.

The National Crime Prevention and Privacy Compact established by federal law is ratified, enacted, and entered into by the State of Georgia. The compact shall become operative immediately upon approval of this state’s participation by the United States Attorney General.

The director shall be the compact officer and shall be responsible for:

Administering the compact within this state;

Ensuring that compact provisions and rules, procedures, and standards established by the compact council are complied with in this state; and

Regulating the in-state use of records received from the Federal Bureau of Investigation or other states party to the compact.

The center shall establish and maintain a criminal history record repository to provide:

Information and records for the National Identification Index and the National Fingerprint File; and

This state’s III System-indexed criminal history records for noncriminal justice purposes described in Article IV of the compact.

This state shall comply with III System rules, procedures, and standards established pursuant to the compact concerning record dissemination and use, response times, data quality, system security, accuracy, privacy protection, and other aspects of the III System operation.

Use of the III System by the center for noncriminal justice purposes authorized in the compact shall be managed so as not to diminish the level of services provided in support of criminal justice purposes.

Administration of the compact provisions shall not reduce the level of services available to noncriminal justice users on the effective date of the compact with this state.

The center shall provide criminal history records, excluding sealed records, to criminal justice agencies and other governmental and nongovernmental agencies for noncriminal justice purposes as required by the compact.

Records obtained under the compact may be used only for the official purposes for which the records were requested and under such procedures established by the director in conformity with rules, procedures, and standards established pursuant to Article IV of the compact.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, fingerprints or other forms of positive identification, as provided for in the compact, shall be submitted with all requests for criminal history record checks for noncriminal justice purposes authorized under the compact. Such records checks made pursuant to any other law of this state shall comply with this Code section, the compact, and federal law.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-3-39.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1999, p. 574, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 136, § 35; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1549, § 2.

Cross references.

Organized Crime Prevention Council, T. 35, C. 7.

Use of confidential, classified, or restricted records for research, §

50-18-101

.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1999, “of 1998” was substituted for “of of 1998” in paragraph (a)(4).

Law reviews.

For note on 1999 enactment of this Code section, see 16 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 227 (1999).

For note, “Just You and Me and Netflix Makes Three: Implications for Allowing ‘Frictionless Sharing’ of Personally Identifiable Information under the Video Privacy Protection Act,” see 20 J. Intell. Prop. L. 413 (2013).

35-3-40.
Construction of article.

In the event of conflict, this article shall to the extent of the conflict supersede all existing statutes which regulate, control, or otherwise relate, directly or by implication, to the collection, storage, and dissemination or usage of fingerprint identification, offender criminal history, uniform crime reporting, and criminal justice activity data records or any existing statutes which relate directly or by implication to any other provisions of this article.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this Code section, this article shall not be understood to alter, amend, or supersede the statutes and rules of law governing the collection, storage, dissemination, or usage of records concerning individual juvenile offenders in which they are individually identified by name or by other means.

History.

Ga. L. 1973, p. 1301, § 9.